Hawaii statutes.
§144-11 Detained feeds. (a)
"Withdrawal from distribution" orders. When the department or its
authorized agent has reasonable cause to believe any lot of feed is being
distributed in violation of this chapter or of any of the prescribed rules
under this chapter, it may issue and enforce a written or printed
"withdrawal from distribution" order, warning the distributor not to
dispose of the lot of feed in any manner until written permission is given by
the department or the circuit court. The department shall release the lot of
feed so withdrawn when the chapter and rules have been complied with. If
compliance is not obtained within thirty days, the department may begin, or
upon request of the distributor or owner shall begin, proceedings for condemnation.

(b) "Condemnation and
confiscation". Any lot of feed not in compliance with the chapter and
rules shall be subject to seizure on complaint of the department to a court of
competent jurisdiction in the area in which the feed is located. In the event
the court finds the feed to be in violation of this chapter and rules and
orders the condemnation of the feed, it shall be disposed of in any manner
consistent with the quality of the feed and the laws of the State; provided
that in no instance shall the disposition of the feed be ordered by the court
without first giving the claimant an opportunity to apply to the court for
release of the feed or for permission to process or relabel the feed to bring
it into compliance with this chapter. [L 1959, c 275, pt of §1; am L Sp 1959
2d, c 1, §22; am L 1961, c 132, §2; Supp, §24-12; HRS §144-12; am L 1979, c
186, pt of §1; am and ren L 1983, c 214, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next